Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-2,113
Interception; subpoena.

A subpoena of the Attorney General or a county attorney may be served by any person designated in the subpoena to serve it. Service upon a natural person may be made by personal delivery of the subpoena to him or her. Service may be made upon a domestic or foreign corporation, upon a partnership, upon a domestic or foreign limited liability company, or upon any other unincorporated association which is subject to suit under a common name, by delivering the subpoena to an officer, a managing or general agent, a member, or any other agent authorized by appointment or by law to receive service of process. The affidavit of the person serving the subpoena entered on a true copy thereof by the person serving it shall be proof of service.

Laws 1976, LB 583, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 553;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-710;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 175.